Missouri, session 2026, HB2317.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 170.375, to read as follows:
170.375. 1. The board of each school district shall require each public school in
such district to conduct educational programs and activities and devote a period of time
at least equal to one class period that honors the struggles and triumphs of black
Americans throughout the history of the United States. Such educational programs and
activities and period of time shall take place in the month of February.
2. The school board, in consultation with the administrators of each public
school in the school district, shall determine the educational programs and activities that
will be conducted to comply with the requirements of this section.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.